Mississippi, session 2026, SB2559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act may be cited as the "Mississippi Healthy Moms, Healthy Babies Act of 2026." SECTION 2. The Legislature finds and declares that: (a)  Mississippi has one of the highest infant mortality rates in the nation, with recent data indicating a rate of approximately 9.7 deaths per 1,000 live births, significantly higher than the national average. (b)  Leading causes of infant mortality in Mississippi include preterm birth, low birth weight, congenital malformations and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS). (c)  Racial disparities are stark, with Black infants experiencing mortality rates of more than twice those of White infants. (d)  Improving maternal health, access to prenatal and postpartum care, safe sleep education and community-based support are evidence-based strategies proven to reduce infant mortality. (e)  There is an urgent need for coordinated state efforts to address this public health crisis. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (b)  "Initiative" means the Mississippi Infant Mortality Reduction Initiative created in Section 4 of this act. (c)  "SIDS" means sudden infant death syndrome. SECTION 4. (1)  There is created within the Mississippi State Department of Health the Mississippi Infant Mortality Reduction Initiative. (2)  The initiative shall coordinate statewide efforts to reduce infant mortality through evidence-based interventions, including, but not limited to: (a)  Expanding access to comprehensive prenatal and postpartum care; (b)  Promoting safe sleep practices and reducing risks associated with SIDS; (c)  Strengthening home visiting and care management programs for at-risk families; and (d)  Addressing social determinants of health contributing to disparities in maternal and infant outcomes. SECTION 5. (1)  The department, in collaboration with the Division of Medicaid, shall develop and implement policies to extend postpartum Medicaid coverage to twelve (12) months following birth for eligible individuals. (2)  The department shall establish grants for community health centers and rural hospitals to provide enhanced prenatal care services, including transportation assistance, nutritional counseling and management of chronic conditions such as hypertension and diabetes. (3)  Health care providers delivering prenatal or infant care shall be required to screen for maternal depression and provide referrals as needed. SECTION 6. (1)  The department shall expand public education campaigns on safe sleep practices, including the distribution of portable cribs or safe sleep surfaces to low-income families. (2)  Hospitals and birthing facilities shall provide safe sleep education and demonstrations to all new parents prior to discharge following delivery. SECTION 7. (1)  The department shall expand funding opportunities for evidence-based home visiting programs, such as the Healthy Moms, Healthy Babies of Mississippi program, targeting high-risk pregnant individuals and families with newborns. (2)  Priority for such funding shall be given to areas with high infant mortality rates and underserved populations, as determined by the department. SECTION 8. (1) The department shall enhance surveillance of infant deaths, including fetal-infant mortality reviews, and annually report to the Legislature on progress toward reducing the infant mortality rate, with specific metrics on racial and geographic disparities. (2)  The report shall include recommendations for further action by the Legislature. SECTION 9. The department may seek federal matching funds, grants and partnerships to effectuate the purposes of this act. SECTION 10.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.